Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,138
Motor vehicle insurance data base; information; restrictions.

Information provided to the department by insurance companies for inclusion in the motor vehicle insurance data base created under section 60-3,136 is the property of the insurance company and the department, as the case may be. The department may disclose whether an individual has the required insurance coverage pursuant to the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act, but in no case shall the department provide any person's insurance coverage information for purposes of resale, for purposes of solicitation, or as bulk listings.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 138.

Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act, see section 60-2901.